Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202661-304
Conflict of interest, prohibited.

(1) An individual listed in subsection (2) of this section or his or her immediate family member shall not, directly or indirectly, hold a financial interest in any entity which is party to a contract or have a financial interest in the ownership or lease of any property relating to the development, construction, management, or operation of the Perkins County Canal Project.

(2) This section shall apply to:

(a) Any elected official in the executive branch of state government. This section shall apply to such official while he or she is in office and for two years after he or she leaves office; and

(b) Any member of the Legislature.

(3) For purposes of this section, immediate family member means a spouse, child, sibling, or parent and includes the spouse of any child, sibling, or parent.

Laws 2022, LB1015, § 4.